Idaho, session 2025, H0484.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Office of Information Technology Ser-
vices the following amounts to be expended for the designated expense
classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30,
2026:
FOR FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY TOTAL
FROM:
General
Fund $22,300 $3,092,300 $5,074,000 $8,188,600
Administration and Accounting Services
Fund 2,481,300 264,100 0 2,745,400
TOTAL $2,503,600 $3,356,400 $5,074,000 $10,934,000
SECTION 2. FTP AUTHORIZATION. In addition to any other authorization
provided by law, the full-time equivalent position authorization provided
to the Office of Information Technology Services is hereby increased by
twenty-two (22.00) for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 3. INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY COST EFFICIENCIES REPORTING. The
Office of Information Technology Services and the Division of Financial
Management shall submit a report with recommendations for information tech-
nology equipment and services cost efficiencies. As part of this report,
the agencies shall include a survey of all executive branch state agency
information technology related expenditures and recommendations to support
the more efficient allocation of information technology related appropri-
ations. The Office of Information Technology Services and the Division of
Financial Management shall provide this report to the Joint Finance-Ap-


propriations Committee and the Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the
Legislative Services Office no later than December 1, 2025.
SECTION 4. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 5. In addition to the appropriation made in Section 1, Chapter
55, Laws of 2024, and any other appropriation provided for by law, there
is hereby appropriated to the Office of Information Technology Services
$81,700 for operating expenditures from the General Fund for the period July
1, 2024, through June 30, 2025.
SECTION 6. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Section 5 of this act shall be in full force and effect on
and after passage and approval, and Sections 1 through 4 of this act shall be
in full force and effect on and after July 1, 2025.